Utah statutes.
67-5-16.   Child protective services investigators within attorney general's office -- Authority.

The attorney general may employ, with the consent of the Division of Child and Family Services within the Department of Human Services, and in accordance with Section 62A-4a-202.6, child protective services investigators to investigate alleged instances of abuse or neglect of a child that occur while a child is in the custody of the Division of Child and Family Services.  Those investigators may also investigate reports of abuse or neglect of a child by an employee of the Department of Human Services, or involving a person or entity licensed to provide substitute care for children in the custody of the Division of Child and Family Services.



Enacted by Chapter 274, 1998 General Session

